Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-308
Appointive officers; bond or insurance.

All appointive officers of a city of the primary class before entering upon their respective duties shall give a good and sufficient bond or evidence of equivalent insurance in an amount to be fixed by ordinance in favor of the city, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 17, p. 76;

R.S.1913, § 4485;

C.S.1922, § 3871;

C.S.1929, § 15-308;

R.S.1943, § 15-308;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 86.

Joint control of funds by principal and surety on bond, see section 11-130.